es: Estado de la goma: Goma original alterada; Con charnela gruesa (HH); Resto de charnela (HR); Con charnela ligera (LH); Nuevo con charnela (MH); Nuevo sin charnela (MNH); Sin goma (NG); No aplicable (sello usado); Goma original (OG); Reengomado; Sin usar (estado de la goma desconocido); Otra
hr-HR: Uvjet gume: Oštećeno originalno ljepilo; Jaki trag falce (HH); Ostatak falce (HR); Slabi trag falce (LH); Nekorišteno s falcom (MH); Nekorišteno bez falce (MNH); Bez ljepila (NG); Nije primjenjivo (korištena marka); Originalno ljepilo (OG); Ponovno naneseno ljepilo; Nekorišteno (stanje ljepila nepoznato); Ostalo
ru: Состояние клея: Поврежденный оригинальный клей; Сильные следы наклейки (HH); Остатки наклейки (HR); Легкие следы наклейки (LH); Чистая с наклейкой (MH); Чистая без наклейки (MNH); Без клея (NG); Неприменимо (гашеная марка); Оригинальный клей (OG); Наведенный клей; Чистая (состояние клея неизвестно); Другое
cs: Stav razítka: Poškozený původní lep; Silně nálepkované (HH); Zbytek nálepky (HR); Lehce nálepkované (LH); Nepoužité s nálepkou (MH); Nepoužité bez nálepky (MNH); Bez lepu (NG); Nelze použít (razítkovaná známka); Původní lep (OG); Nový lep; Nepoužité (stav lepu neznámý); Jiný
ja: 糊の状態: ディスターブド・オリジナルガム; ヘビーヒンジ (HH); ヒンジ跡 (HR); ライトヒンジ (LH); ミントヒンジ (MH); ミントノーヒンジ (MNH); ガムなし (NG); 該当なし (使用済み切手); オリジナルガム (OG); 再糊引き; 未使用 (糊の状態不明); その他
sv: Gummits skick (för frimärke): Påverkad originalgummering; Kraftigt spår av fastsättare (HH); Fastsättarerest (HR); Lätt spår av fastsättare (LH); Ostämplat med fastsättare (MH); Postfriskt (MNH); Utan gummering (NG); Ej tillämpligt (stämplat frimärke); Originalgummering (OG); Omgummerat; Ostämplat (okänd gummeringsstatus); Övrigt
vi: Tình trạng keo dán: Keo gốc bị xáo trộn; Dán bản lề nhiều (HH); Sót bản lề (HR); Dán bản lề ít (LH); Mới dán bản lề (MH); Mới chưa dán bản lề (MNH); Không keo (NG); Không áp dụng (tem đã qua sử dụng); Keo gốc (OG); Phết lại keo; Chưa sử dụng (không rõ tình trạng keo); Khác
pt-PT: Estado da goma: Goma original alterada; Marca de charneira forte (HH); Resto de charneira (HR); Marca de charneira ligeira (LH); Novo com charneira (MH); Novo sem marca de charneira (MNH); Sem goma (NG); Não aplicável (selo usado); Goma original (OG); Regomado; Não usado (estado da goma desconhecido); Outro
sl-SI: Stanje dlesni: Poškodovana originalna guma; Močno prilepljena (HH); Ostanek tečaja (HR); Rahlo prilepljena (LH); Neuporabljena s tečajem (MH); Neuporabljena brez tečaja (MNH); Brez gume (NG); Ni primerno (rabljena znamka); Originalna guma (OG); Ponovno premazano z gumo; Neuporabljena (stanje gume neznano); Drugo
nl: Gom conditie: Verstoorde originele gom; Zwaar geplakt (HH); Plakkerrest (HR); Licht geplakt (LH); Postfris met plakker (MH); Postfris zonder plakker (MNH); Zonder gom (NG); Niet van toepassing (gebruikte postzegel); Originele gom (OG); Opnieuw gegomd; Ongebruikt (gomstatus onbekend); Overig
bg-BG: Състояние на дъвката: Нарушено оригинално лепило; С тежък фалц (HH); Остатък от фалц (HR); С лек фалц (LH); Неупотребявани с фалц (MH); Неупотребявани без фалц (MNH); Без лепило (NG); Не е приложимо (употребявана марка); Оригинално лепило (OG); С ново лепило; Неупотребявани (неизвестно състояние на лепилото); Други
hu: Gumi állapota: Sérült eredeti ragasztó; Erősen falcos (HH); Falcmaradványos (HR); Enyhén falcos (LH); Postatiszta, falcos (MH); Postatiszta, falc nélküli (MNH); Ragasztó nélküli (NG); Nem értelmezhető (használt bélyeg); Eredeti ragasztó (OG); Újragumizott; Használatlan (ragasztó állapota ismeretlen); Egyéb
fi: Huopien tila: Vaurioitunut alkuperäinen liima; Vahvasti liimakkeellinen (HH); Liimakkeen jäänne (HR); Kevyesti liimakkeellinen (LH); Leimaamaton liimakkeellinen (MH); Leimaamaton liimakkeeton (MNH); Ei liimaa (NG); Ei sovelleta (leimattu postimerkki); Alkuperäinen liima (OG); Uudelleenliimoitettu; Käyttämätön (liiman tila tuntematon); Muu
zh-CN: 橡胶件状态: 受损原胶; 重贴纸（HH）; 残留贴纸（HR）; 轻贴纸（LH）; 全新带贴（MH）; 全新无贴（MNH）; 无胶（NG）; 不适用（旧票）; 原胶（OG）; 重上胶; 未使用（背胶状况未知）; 其他
tr: Sakız kıvamı: Bozulmuş orijinal zamk; Ağır şarniyerli (HH); Şarniyer kalıntısı (HR); Hafif şarniyerli (LH); Şarniyerli çil (MH); Şarniyersiz çil (MNH); Zamksız (NG); Geçerli değil (kullanılmış pul); Orijinal zamk (OG); Yeniden zamklanmış; Kullanılmamış (zamk durumu bilinmiyor); Diğer
fr: État de la gomme: Gomme originale altérée; Fortement charniéré (HH); Reste de charnière (HR); Légèrement charniéré (LH); Neuf avec charnière (MH); Neuf sans charnière (MNH); Sans gomme (NG); Non applicable (timbre oblitéré); Gomme originale (OG); Regommé; Non oblitéré (état de la gomme inconnu); Autre
nb: Tannkjøtttilstand: Forstyrret originalgummi; Kraftig hengslet (HH); Hengselrest (HR); Lett hengslet (LH); Postfrisk hengslet (MH); Postfrisk aldri hengslet (MNH); Uten gummi (NG); Ikke relevant (stemplet frimerke); Originalgummi (OG); Regummiert; Ubrukt (ukjent gummistatus); Annet
pt-BR: Goma condição: Goma original alterada; Com marca forte de charneira (HH); Resto de charneira (HR); Com marca leve de charneira (LH); Novo com charneira (MH); Novo sem charneira (MNH); Sem goma (NG); Não aplicável (selo usado); Goma original (OG); Regomado; Não usado (estado da goma desconhecido); Outro
da: Gummitilstand: Beskadiget originalgummi; Kraftigt hængslet (HH); Hængselrest (HR); Let hængslet (LH); Ustemplet hængslet (MH); Postfrisk (MNH); Uden gummi (NG); Ikke relevant (stemplet frimærke); Originalgummi (OG); Opgummieret; Ustemplet (gummistatus ukendt); Andet
lt-LT: Dervos būklė: Pažeisti originalūs klijai; Su ryškiomis įklijos žymėmis (HH); Su įklijos likučiu (HR); Su nežymiomis įklijos žymėmis (LH); Naujas, su įklijos žyme (MH); Naujas, be įklijos (MNH); Be klijų (NG); Netaikoma (naudotas pašto ženklas); Originalūs klijai (OG); Perklijuotas; Nenaudotas (klijų būklė nežinoma); Kita
ko: 잇몸 상태: 훼손된 오리지널 검; 헤비 힌지(HH); 힌지 흔적(HR); 라이트 힌지(LH); 민트 힌지(MH); 민트 네버 힌지(MNH); 노 검(NG); 해당 없음(사용된 우표); 오리지널 검(OG); 리검; 미사용(검 상태 알 수 없음); 기타
pl: Stan gumy: Naruszona oryginalna guma; Z dużym śladem po podlepce (HH); Resztka podlepki (HR); Z lekkim śladem po podlepce (LH); Czysty z podlepką (MH); Czysty bez podlepki (MNH); Bez gumy (NG); Nie dotyczy (znaczek kasowany); Oryginalna guma (OG); Wtórnie gumowany; Czysty (stan gumy nieznany); Inne
zh-TW: 背膠狀況: 受損原膠; 重貼痕 (HH); 殘膠 (HR); 輕貼痕 (LH); 新票貼痕 (MH); 新票無貼痕 (MNH); 無膠 (NG); 不適用 (信銷票); 原膠 (OG); 重新上膠; 未使用 (背膠狀態未知); 其他
sk-SK: Stav ďasien: Porušený pôvodný lep; Silne s nálepkou (HH); Zvyšok nálepky (HR); Zľahka s nálepkou (LH); Nepoužité s nálepkou (MH); Nepoužité bez nálepky (MNH); Bez lepu (NG); Nevzťahuje sa (použitá známka); Pôvodný lep (OG); Obnovený lep; Nepoužité (stav lepu neznámy); Iné
de: Zustand der Gummierung: Beeinträchtigte Originalgummierung; Stark gefalzt (HH); Falzrest (HR); Leicht gefalzt (LH); Postfrisch gefalzt (MH); Postfrisch ohne Falz (MNH); Ohne Gummierung (NG); Nicht zutreffend (gestempelt); Originalgummierung (OG); Nachgummiert; Ungebraucht (Gummierungsstatus unbekannt); Sonstige
ro-RO: Stare adeziv: Gumă originală alterată; Puternic șarnierată (HH); Rest de șarnieră (HR); Ușor șarnierată (LH); Nouă cu șarnieră (MH); Nouă fără șarnieră (MNH); Fără gumă (NG); Nu se aplică (timbru uzat); Gumă originală (OG); Regumată; Neuzat (stare gumă necunoscută); Altele
it: Condizione della gomma: Gomma originale alterata; Molto linguellato (HH); Traccia di linguella (HR); Leggermente linguellato (LH); Nuovo linguellato (MH); Nuovo senza linguella (MNH); Senza gomma (NG); Non applicabile (francobollo usato); Gomma originale (OG); Rigommato; Non usato (stato della gomma sconosciuto); Altro
en: Gum condition: Disturbed original gum; Heavily hinged (HH); Hinge remnant (HR); Lightly hinged (LH); Mint hinged (MH); Mint never hinged (MNH); No gum (NG); Not applicable (used stamp); Original gum (OG); Regummed; Unused (gum status unknown); Other
el: Κατάσταση γόμας γραμματοσήμου: Αλλοιωμένη αρχική γόμα; Με βαριά σαρνιέρα (HH); Υπόλειμμα σαρνιέρας (HR); Με ελαφριά σαρνιέρα (LH); Άθικτο με σαρνιέρα (MH); Άθικτο χωρίς σαρνιέρα (MNH); Χωρίς γόμα (NG); Δεν ισχύει (σφραγισμένο γραμματόσημο); Αρχική γόμα (OG); Με νέα γόμα; Αχρησιμοποίητο (άγνωστη κατάσταση γόμας); Άλλο
th: หมากฝรั่งอีกครั้งสินค้า: กาวเดิมมีตำหนิ; มีรอยบานพับมาก (HH); มีคราบบานพับ (HR); มีรอยบานพับเล็กน้อย (LH); ใหม่มีรอยบานพับ (MH); ใหม่ไม่มีรอยบานพับ (MNH); ไม่มีกาว (NG); ไม่ระบุ (แสตมป์ใช้แล้ว); กาวเดิม (OG); ทากาวใหม่; ไม่ผ่านการใช้งาน (ไม่ทราบสถานะกาว); อื่นๆ